activities/first.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V +Pres +3Sg +PresPtc +Past

! Lexicon containing lexical stems:
LEXICON Root
walk V ;
talk V ;
pack V ;
t V-each-aught ; ! teach+V+Past:taught

LEXICON V-each-aught
each+V+Pres+3Sg:eaches # ;
each+V+Pres:each # ;
each+V+Past:aught # ;

! Lexicon containing POS tag only:
LEXICON V
+V: V-suff ;

! Lexicon containing inflectional suffixes and corresponding tags:
LEXICON V-suff
+Pres+3Sg:s   # ;
+Past:ed  # ;
+PresPtc:ing # ;
+Pres:    # ;
